Louisiana, session 2026, HB502.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:3160(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3160. Rights and powers of commission
A. The commission shall exercise the powers herein conferred upon it,
within the port area, consisting of the entire parishes of Caddo and Bossier; however,
specifically excluded from the port area are any docks, landings or wharves in use
on November 8, 1966, and businesses engaged in river operations in the port area on
November 8, 1966. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, prior to
approving the use of the payment in lieu of taxes program in Caddo Parish, the
governing authority shall fully evaluate and provide documentation of the property
taxes abated by each taxing entity. The documentation shall be provided to the
political subdivisions contained in this Subsection who shall use the information to
determine whether to approve the program. In Caddo Parish, the Caddo Parish
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-419 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 502
Sheriff, the Caddo Parish Commission, and the Caddo Parish School Board shall
each independently determine whether to approve the abatement of their respective
portions of property taxes. The Caddo Parish Commission may also approve the
abatement of the portions of property taxes attributable to other political subdivisions
in Caddo Parish, except the Caddo Parish Sheriff and the Caddo Parish School
Board. Approval or denial by one entity shall not affect the authority of any other
entity, and if one or more entities approve the abatement while others deny it, the
project may proceed with the abatement applying only to the portions approved.
* * *